Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.071

University of Washington fund—Moneys transferred to general fund.

All moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the University of Washington fund on the first day of May, 1955, and all moneys thereafter paid into the state treasury for or to the credit of the University of Washington fund, shall be and are hereby transferred to and placed in the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.071. Prior: 1955 c 332 s 1.]